Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska16-905
Designation of jurisdiction; how described.

An ordinance of any city of the first class designating the extraterritorial zoning jurisdiction of the city under section 16-901 or 16-902 shall describe such territory by metes and bounds or by reference to an official map.

Laws 1993, LB 208, § 2;

Laws 2016, LB704, § 205.